Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5388.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 224d. (1) As used in this section and section 224, "self-defense spray or foam device" means a device to which all of the following apply: (a) The device is capable of carrying, and ejects, releases, or emits 1 of the following: (i) Not more than 35 grams of any combination of orthochlorobenzalmalononitrile and inert ingredients. (ii) A solution containing not more than 18% oleoresin capsicum. (iii) A solution containing an ultraviolet dye and not more than 18% oleoresin capsicum. (iv) A solution containing not more than 8% chlorobenzylidene malononitrile and 1% nonenamide. (b) The device does not eject, release, or emit any gas or substance that will temporarily or permanently disable, incapacitate, injure, or harm a person with whom the gas or substance comes in contact, other than the substance described in subdivision (a)(i), (ii), or (iii), or (iv). (2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person who uses a self-defense spray or foam device to eject, release, or emit orthochlorobenzalmalononitrile, or oleoresin capsicum, chlorobenzylidene malononitrile, or nonenamide at another person is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment for not more than 2 years, or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. (3) If a person uses a self-defense spray or foam device during the commission of a crime to eject, release, or emit orthochlorobenzalmalononitrile, or oleoresin capsicum, chlorobenzylidene malononitrile, or nonenamide or threatens to use a self-defense spray or foam device during the commission of a crime to temporarily or permanently disable another person, the judge who imposes sentence upon a conviction for that crime shall consider the defendant's use or threatened use of the self-defense spray or foam device as a reason for enhancing the sentence. (4) A person shall not sell a self-defense spray or foam device to a minor. A person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. (5) Subsection (2) does not prohibit either of the following: (a) The reasonable use of a self-defense spray or foam device containing not more than 18% oleoresin capsicum or 8% chlorobenzylidene malononitrile and 1% nonenamide by a person who is employed by a county sheriff or a chief of police and who is authorized in writing by the county sheriff or chief of police to carry and use a self-defense spray or foam device and has been trained in the use, effects, and risks of the device, while in performance of his or her official the person's duties. (b) The reasonable use of either of the following by a person in the protection of a person or property under circumstances that would justify the person's use of physical force: (i) A self-defense spray or foam device containing not more than 18% oleoresin capsicum. (ii) A self-defense spray or foam device containing an ultraviolet dye and not more than 18% oleoresin capsicum. (iii) A self-defense spray or foam device containing not more than 8% chlorobenzylidene malononitrile and 1% nonenamide. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.